Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.454

Occupational and environmental research facility—Submission of industrial and occupational health problems to facility—Availability of information.

Any matter or problem relating to the industrial and occupational health of workers may be submitted to the environmental research facility by any public agency or interested party. All research data and pertinent information available or compiled at such facility related to the industrial and occupational health of workers shall be made available and supplied without cost to any public agency or interested party.

[ 1989 c 12 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.454. Prior: 1963 c 151 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.77.414.]